Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4023.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) Not later than 2 years after the effective date of this act, the state administrative board, on behalf of this state, may convey real property described in this section to the Michigan Police Equipment Company. The conveyance is intended to eliminate a slight encroachment by a building or buildings of the Michigan Police Equipment Company on state land that is now under the administrative jurisdiction of the department of technology, management, and budget, but which that department has determined is surplus to this stateâs needs. (2) A conveyance under this act must be for not less than fair market value as determined under section 3 plus this stateâs reasonable and demonstrable costs of implementing this conveyance under section 8. (3) The property to be conveyed under this act is located in Windsor Township, Eaton County, Michigan, and is described as follows: A parcel of land in the Southeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section 9, Town 3 North, Range 3 West, Windsor Township, Eaton County, Michigan, described as commencing at the North 1/4 corner of said Section 9; thence S 00Â°14â26â E 1770.30 feet along the north-south 1/4 line of said Section 9 to the centerline of south-bound Lansing road; thence S 50Â°52â22â W 510.71 feet along said centerline to the point of beginning; thence N 38Â°44â04â W 256.42 feet; thence S 50Â°50â44â W 131.99 feet; thence S 38Â°37â37â E 256.36 feet to said centerline; thence N 50Â°52â22â E 3.18 feet along said centerline; thence N 37Â°50â38â W 198.00 feet; thence N 50Â°52â22â E 107.00 feet; thence S 37Â°50â38â E 198.00 feet to said centerline; thence N 50Â°52â22â E 22.29 feet along said centerline to the point of beginning. Containing 0.29 acres, more or less. Subject to all agreements, covenants, easements, rights-of-way, reservations, and restrictions of record, if any. Sec. 2. The description of the property in section 1 is approximate and, for purposes of a conveyance under this act, may be adjusted as the state administrative board or the department of attorney general considers necessary because of a survey or another legal description. Sec. 3. The fair market value of the property to be conveyed under this act must be determined by an appraisal based on the propertyâs highest and best use, as prepared by an independent fee appraiser commissioned for that purpose by the department of technology, management, and budget. Sec. 4. The property conveyed under this act must include all surplus, salvage, and scrap property and all permanent improvements made on the property as of the date of the conveyance. Sec. 5. A conveyance under this act must be by a quitclaim deed that is prepared, or otherwise approved as to legal form, by the department of attorney general. Sec. 6. This state shall not reserve oil, gas, or mineral rights to property conveyed under this act. However, the conveyance authorized under this act must provide that, if the Michigan Police Equipment Company or any successor in title develops any oil, gas, or minerals found on, within, or under the conveyed property, the Michigan Police Equipment Company or any successor must pay this state 1/2 of the gross revenue generated from the development of the oil, gas, or minerals. A payment under this section must be deposited in the general fund. Sec. 7. A conveyance under this act must reserve to this state all aboriginal antiquities, including mounds, earthworks, forts, burial and village sites, mines, or other relics lying on, within, or under the property, with power to this state and all others acting under its authority to enter the property for any purpose related to exploring, excavating, and taking away the aboriginal antiquities. Sec. 8. The net revenue received from the sale of property under this section must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the general fund. As used in this section, ânet revenueâ means the proceeds from the sale of the property less reimbursement for any costs to the department of technology, management, and budget associated with the sale, including, but not limited to, surveying, appraising, researching, and closing a sale of the property plus the costs of any environmental remediation, legal fees, and any litigation related to the conveyance of the property. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor